Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.455

Duties of registered agent.

The only duties under this chapter of a registered agent that has complied with this chapter are:

(1) To forward to the represented entity at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the entity any process, notice, or demand pertaining to the entity which is served on or received by the agent;

(2) To provide the notices required by this chapter to the entity at the address most recently supplied to the agent by the entity;

(3) If the agent is a noncommercial registered agent, to keep current the information required by RCW 23.95.415(1) in the most recent registered agent filing for the entity; and

(4) If the agent is a commercial registered agent, to keep current the information listed for it under RCW 23.95.420(1).

[ 2015 c 176 s 1412.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.